Utah statutes.
39-7-106.   Fines and penalties on contracts.

(1)  If compliance with the terms of a contract is stayed pursuant to this chapter, a fine or penalty may not accrue by reason of failure to comply during the period of the stay.

(2)  If a service member has not obtained a stay and a fine or penalty is imposed for nonperformance of an obligation, a court may relieve enforcement if the service member was in military service when the penalty was incurred and his ability to pay or perform was materially impaired.

